California statutes. Education Code
(B) Second, to any park or recreation district within which the land may be situated.

(C) Third, to any regional park authority having jurisdiction within the area in which the land is situated.

(D) Fourth, to any county within which the land may be situated.

(2) The governing board of a school district, before selling or leasing a schoolsite to which paragraph (1) would otherwise apply, but which was purchased with or modernized with, or on which improvements were constructed that were funded with, any moneys
 from a state school facilities funding program, and to which subdivision (a) of Section 17462.3 is applicable, after first offering the schoolsite for sale or lease to a charter school that has requested notification pursuant to Section 17457.5, may offer to sell or lease the property to another school district, a county office of education, or a governmental entity that provides child care and development services pursuant to Section 17458 before offering to sell or lease the property to the entities listed in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(b) The governing board of the
 school district shall have discretion to determine whether the offer shall be an offer to sell or an offer to lease.

(c) An entity which proposes to purchase or lease a schoolsite offered by a school district shall notify the school district of its intention, in writing, within 60 days after receiving written notification from the school district of its offer to sell or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.   (AB 1664)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17490.

In determining what portion of a schoolsite shall be offered for sale or lease pursuant to this article, the governing board may retain any part of the schoolsite containing structures or buildings, together with such land adjacent thereto which, as determined by the governing board, must be included in order to avoid reducing the value of that part of the schoolsite containing such structures or buildings to less than 50 percent of fair market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17491.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) or (e), the price at which land described in Section 17486, excluding that portion of a schoolsite retained by the governing board pursuant to Section 17490, is sold pursuant to this article shall not exceed the school district’s cost of acquisition, calculated as a pro rata cost of acquiring the entire parcel comprising the schoolsite, adjusted by a factor equivalent to the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living from the date of purchase to the year in which the offer of sale is made, plus the cost of any improvement to the recreational and open-space portion of the land which the school district has made since its acquisition of the land. In no event shall the price be less than 25 percent of the fair market value of the land described in Section 17486 or less than the amount necessary to retire the share of local bonded indebtedness plus the amount of the original cost of the approved state aid applications on the property, excluding that portion of a schoolsite retained by the governing board pursuant to Section 17489, at the time of the offer.

These provisions shall apply to land that the school district acquired by gift or for consideration.

(b) A school district that offers a portion of a schoolsite for sale may offer such portion of property for sale at its fair market value, provided the school district offers an equivalent size alternative portion of that schoolsite for school playground, playing field, or other recreational and open-space purposes.

(c) Land which is leased pursuant to this article shall be leased at an annual rate of not more than 1/20th of the maximum sales price determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, adjusted annually by a factor equivalent to the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living for the immediately preceding year.

(d) The percentage of annual increase or decrease in the cost of living shall be the amount shown for January 1st of the appropriate year by the then current Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumers Price Index for the area in which the schoolsite is located.

(e) Whenever a school district closes a schoolsite and sells any land described in Section 17486 pursuant to this article to help pay only for capital outlay costs incurred directly as a result of the transfer of pupils from the closed school to another school or other schools of the district, the sale price of the property determined pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be increased by an amount equal to the additional costs incurred due to the school closure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17492.

The governing body of a public agency which proposes to purchase or lease land from a school district pursuant to this article shall first make a finding, approved by a vote of two-thirds of its members, that public lands in the vicinity of the schoolsite are inadequate to meet the existing and foreseeable needs of the community for playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational and open-space purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17493.

(a) No public agency may purchase surplus school property from a school district pursuant to this article unless it has first adopted a plan for the purchase of surplus school property. The plan shall designate the surplus site or sites all or a portion of which the public agency desires to purchase at the price established pursuant to this article and shall designate at least 70 percent of the total surplus school acreage as property which the agency does not desire to purchase at the price established pursuant to this article. Where the plan indicates that the agency desires to purchase only a portion of a schoolsite at the price established pursuant to this article, it shall designate the percent of the property to be so purchased and provide a description of the general location of the property to be purchased, without designating the metes and bounds.

(b) Any property designated by public agencies as surplus schoolsites which the agencies do not wish to purchase, pursuant to subdivision (a), may be sold or leased by a school district without regard to this article.

(c) This section shall become operative on April 1, 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17494.

Any land purchased or leased by a public agency pursuant to this article shall thereafter be maintained by such agency for playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational and open-space uses. Land which prior to its sale or lease was used for playground or playing field purposes, shall continue to be maintained for such use by the acquiring agency, unless the governing body of that agency, by a two-thirds vote at a public hearing, determines that there is no longer a significant need for the land to be so used, in which case the land may thereafter be used for other outdoor recreational or open-space purposes. The school district may, at any time, reacquire the land at a price calculated in the manner prescribed in Section 17491, and the rights of reacquisition provided in this section shall be set forth in the deed or other instrument of transfer. If the governing board of the public agency determines that the land is no longer needed for playground, playing field, or other outdoor recreational and open-space purposes, the public agency shall offer the property to the school district for reacquisition under this section, and the school district shall notify the public agency within 60 days of its intent to reacquire the land. If the school district intends to sell the property within one year of the reacquisition date, the school district may finance the reacquisition of the land by lien against the proceeds to be obtained from the sale of the land by the school district. If the school district fails to give the public agency timely notice of its intent to reacquire the property, or if it fails to exercise its right of reacquisition, the public agency may use or dispose of the property.

For purposes of this section, “cost of acquisition,” as used in Section 17491, shall refer to the cost at which the land was acquired by the public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17495.

The sale or lease of land by a school district pursuant to this article shall be subject to, and governed by, the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 17230) of Chapter 1 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 17455), except to the extent that the provisions of this article are inconsistent with a provision or provisions of Article 2 or 4, in which event the provisions of this article shall govern the sale or lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17496.

Failure by the school district to comply with the provisions of this article shall not invalidate the transfer or conveyance of real property to a purchaser or encumbrancer for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17497.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this article, any school district governing board may designate not more than two surplus schoolsites as exempt from the provisions of this article for each planned schoolsite acquisition if the school district has an immediate need for an additional schoolsite and is actively seeking to acquire an additional site, and may exempt not more than one surplus schoolsite if the district is seeking immediate expansion of the classroom capacity of an existing school by 50 percent or more.

The exemption provided for by this section shall be inapplicable to any schoolsite which, under a lease executed on or before July 1, 1974, with a term of 10 years, was leased to a city of under 100,000 population for park purposes, was improved at city expense, and used for public park purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17498.

A school district having a schoolsite described in Section 17486 may, as an alternative to sale or lease of the land pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this article, enter into other forms of agreement concerning the disposition of the property with any entity enumerated in Section 17489, in accordance with the priorities therein specified, including, but not limited to each of the following:

(a) An agreement to lease to such entity all or part of the schoolsite for a specified term, with an option to purchase such properties at the end of the term.

(b) An agreement granting to the entity a permanent open-space easement for recreational use over a portion of the leased site.

(c) If the lessee or a grantee under an agreement is an entity having zoning powers, an agreement requiring the entity to rezone any portion of the property retained by the school district in accordance with conditions specified in the agreement, to the extent that rezoning in accordance with the conditions is in compliance with applicable laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17499.

(a)No more than 30 percent of the total surplus school acreage owned by a school district may be purchased or leased by public agencies pursuant to this article.

(b) The right of any public agency to purchase or lease surplus school property pursuant to this article shall exist only with respect to an amount of surplus school acreage within its jurisdictional boundaries which, when added to the surplus school acreage within its jurisdictional boundaries already purchased or leased pursuant to this article, will not exceed 30 percent of the surplus school acreage owned by the school district which is within the jurisdictional boundaries of that agency.

(c) For purposes of this section, “surplus school acreage” of a school district means property which is owned by a district and not used for school purposes, including, but not limited to, undeveloped property and property which contains school buildings that are not in use as a result of a school closure and which is not subject to any lease or agreement executed on or before July 1, 1974, for a term in excess of six years, in which any city containing a population of less than 100,000 had use of the property for park purposes on January 1, 1981, and had improved the property.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny local agencies the opportunity to purchase at full market value all or part of the 70 percent of the total surplus school acreage which is not affected by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17500.

This article shall not apply to any school district having more than 250,000 pupils in average daily attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 3.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Leasing for Production of Gas [17510. - 17512.]

17510.

The governing board of a school district may, upon complying with this article, enter into and be a party to a community lease to which a city or other public agency and one or more private persons or private agencies are also parties for the leasing of the parcels of lands owned by the district and the other parties for the extraction and taking of gas not associated with oil, on the terms and conditions that the governing board of the district may prescribe. The lease may be entered into without complying with any provisions of this code except as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17511.

The board shall not enter into and be a party to any lease unless the following conditions have been met:

(a) A resolution authorizing that action and prescribing the terms of the lease has been adopted by the unanimous vote of all the members elected or appointed to the board.

(b) The resolution has been published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there be no newspaper, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district, once a week for three weeks prior to the execution of the lease by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17512.

No well for the production of gas shall be drilled on any land owned by the district and leased pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Joint Occupancy [17515. - 17526.]

17515.

Any school district may enter into leases and agreements relating to real property and buildings to be used jointly by the district and any private person, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation pursuant to this article. As used in this article, “building” includes onsite and offsite facilities, utilities and improvements that, as agreed upon by the parties, are appropriate for the proper operation or function of the building to be occupied jointly by the district and the private person, firm, or corporation. It also includes the permanent improvement of school grounds.

Any building, or portion thereof, that is used by a private person,
 firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation pursuant to this section shall be subject to the zoning and building code requirements of the local jurisdiction in which the building is situated.

Section 53094 of the Government Code shall not be applicable to uses of school district property or buildings authorized by this section, except in the case of property or buildings used solely for educational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   (AB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17516.

(a) Before the governing board of a school district enters into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, it shall own a site upon which a building to be used by the district and private person, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation may be constructed and shall have complied with the provisions of law relating to the selection and approval of sites.

(b) This section shall not apply to any building to be acquired by purchase pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 17110) of Chapter 16 of Part 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 383, Sec. 2.   (AB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17517.

The term of a lease or agreement entered into by a school district pursuant to this article shall not exceed 99 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 204, Sec. 2.   (AB 1406)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17518.

(a) The governing board of a school district may let to any private person, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation, any real property that belongs to the district if the instrument by which the property is let requires the lessee therein to construct on the demised premises, or provide for the construction thereon of, a building or buildings for the joint use of the school district and the private person, firm,
 local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation during the term of the agreement.

(b) However, title to that portion of the building to be occupied by the private individual, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation shall remain exclusively the personal property of the private party during the term of the lease and the title to that portion of the building to be occupied by the district shall vest in the district upon completion thereof and acceptance thereof by the school district. No rental fee or other charge for the use of the building shall be paid by
 the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 383, Sec. 3.   (AB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17519.

Any lease of real property by a school district to a private person, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation pursuant to this article shall be upon the terms and conditions as the parties thereto may agree and may be entered into without complying with any provisions of this code except as provided in this article. However, any lease or agreement pursuant to this article shall be subject to Article 7 (commencing with Section 35230) of Chapter 2 of Part 21.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.   (AB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17520.

Before entering into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, the governing board of a school district shall comply with Section 17521.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17521.

For the purposes of receiving proposals for the joint occupancy of a building to be constructed on school property, the board shall, in a regular open meeting, adopt a resolution declaring its intention to consider the proposals. The resolution shall describe the proposed site on which the building to be jointly occupied is to be constructed in a manner so as to identify the site, shall specify the intended use of that portion of the building that is to be occupied by the district, and shall fix a time not less than 90 days thereafter for a public meeting of the governing board to be held at its regular place of meeting, at which meeting the board shall receive and consider all plans or proposals submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17522.

Notice of adoption of the resolution and the time and place of holding the meeting shall be given by publishing the resolution at least once a week for three weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district if there is one, or if none is published in the district, in a newspaper published in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17523.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution for the meeting of the governing board, the board shall meet and consider all plans and proposals submitted for the joint occupancy of the building to be constructed on the proposed schoolsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17524.

(a) After considering all proposals submitted, the governing board of the school district may, subject to Section 17525, select the plan or proposal that best meets the needs of the school district and enter into a contract incorporating that plan or proposal either as submitted or as revised by the governing board of the school district.

(b) The governing board shall require any person, firm, local governmental agency, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 4420 of the Government Code, or corporation with whom it enters into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article to file one of the following, as determined by the governing board:

(1) A bond for the performance of the lease or agreement.

(2) An irrevocable letter of credit issued by a state or national bank or a federal or state credit union for the performance of the lease or agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 15.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17525.

Any building constructed for the use of a school district pursuant to this article is subject to Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive, and all other provisions of this code relating to the physical structure of school buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17526.

The provisions of this article prevail over any provisions of law that conflict therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Joint Use [17527. - 17535.]

17527.

(a) The governing board of any school district may enter into agreements to make vacant classrooms or other space in operating school buildings available for rent or lease to other school districts, educational agencies, except private educational institutions which maintain kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, governmental units, nonprofit organizations, community agencies, professional agencies, commercial and noncommercial firms, corporations, partnerships, businesses, and individuals, including during normal school hours if the school is in session.

(b) The governing board shall give first priority in leasing or renting vacant classroom space or other space to educational agencies for conducting special education programs and second priority to other educational agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17528.

As used in this article, “building” includes onsite and offsite facilities, utilities, and improvements which, as agreed upon by the parties, are appropriate for the proper operation or function of the building to be jointly occupied and used. It also includes the permanent improvement of school grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17529.

Prior to entering into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, the school district governing board shall determine that the proposed joint occupancy and use of school district property or buildings will not do any of the following:

(a) Interfere with the educational program or activities of any school or class conducted upon the real property or in any building.

(b) Unduly disrupt the residents in the surrounding neighborhood.

(c) Jeopardize the safety of the children of the school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17530.

The governing board of a school district entering into a lease pursuant to this article shall comply with the applicable provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 17455).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17531.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section and Section 17532, the amount of classroom space leased pursuant to this article in any schoolsite during normal school hours shall not exceed 45 percent of the total classroom space of that school, and in no event shall the leased classroom space in the school district during normal school hours exceed 30 percent of the district’s total classroom space in operating schools.

(b) The governing board of a school district may, upon a two-thirds vote, enter into lease agreements which exceed the 45 percent limit per school upon making a finding that the leases are compatible with the educational purpose of the school. The board, however, shall not exceed, pursuant to this subdivision, the 30 percent limit of classroom space for the entire school district.

(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to agreements for the lease of classroom space entered into by districts on or before March 4, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17532.

The governing board of a school district may lease vacant classroom space the total area of which exceeds the 30 percent districtwide limit of classroom space available pursuant to this article, if a lease is for any day care center, nursery school, or special education class.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17533.

A local agency having general planning jurisdiction may require adherence to appropriate zoning ordinances, use permits, construction or safety codes, by a school district seeking to lease a portion of a school building for uses other than public or education-related uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17534.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the term of any agreement entered into by a school district pursuant to this article shall not exceed five years.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not apply to agreements under or pursuant to which capital outlay improvements are made on school property for park and recreation purposes by public entities and nonprofit corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17535.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no agreement entered into by a school district pursuant to this article shall rent or lease vacant classrooms or other space in operating schools for less than fair market rental for comparable facilities.

(b) A district may enter into an agreement to rent or lease vacant classrooms or other space in operating schools to public entities for less than fair market rental for comparable facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Exchange of Property [17536. - 17538.]

17536.

The governing board of a school district may exchange any of its real property for real property of another person or private business firm. Any exchange shall be upon such terms and conditions as the parties thereto may agree and may be entered into without complying with any provisions in this code except as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17537.

Before ordering any exchange of real property the board shall adopt, by a two-thirds vote of its members, a resolution declaring its intention to exchange the property. The resolution shall describe the properties to be exchanged in a manner to identify them, and the terms and conditions, not including the price, upon which they will be exchanged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.

The governing board of any school district which has acquired title to property included within an application which has been approved by the State Allocation Board for state school building aid and which property is to be used as an access roadway to the schoolsite may exchange the property for other property to be used as an access roadway which abuts a state highway, if in the opinion of the Division of Highways in the Department of Transportation there is objection to the first access roadway, and if in the opinion of the governing board the property acquired by the exchange will afford more safety to the pupils of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Sale or Lease of Personal Property by One District to Another [17540. - 17542.]

17540.

The governing board of any school district may sell any personal property or school supplies belonging to the district to the federal government or its agencies, to the state, to any county, city and county, city or special district, or to any other school district or any agency eligible under the federal surplus property law, (40 U.S.C. Sec. 484(j)(3)) and the governing board of another school district may purchase the property, for an amount equal to the cost thereof plus the estimated cost of purchasing, storing, and handling the property, without advertisement for or receipt of bids or compliance with any other provisions of this code. The governing board of any school district may purchase any personal property or school supplies for the purpose of selling them, pursuant to this section.

This section does not authorize the purchase, for the purpose of resale, of standard school supplies and equipment by any elementary school district governed by school trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17541.

The provisions of Section 17540 shall be applicable to a sale of personal property from a unified school district whose boundaries are coterminous with a city or city and county to that city or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17542.

The governing board of any school district may sell or lease used personal property belonging to the district to the federal government or its agencies, to the state, to any county, city and county, city or special district, or to any other school district, and the governing board of another school district may purchase or lease the property. The selling price and the terms of sale, or the lease price and the terms of lease shall be fixed by the governing boards of the school districts effecting the sale or lease, and approved by the county superintendent of schools. The sale or lease may be made without advertisement for or receipt of bids, or compliance with any other provisions of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Sale of Personal Property [17545. - 17555.]

17545.

(a) The governing board of any school district may sell for cash any personal property belonging to the district if the property is not required for school purposes, or if it should be disposed of for the purpose of replacement, or if it is unsatisfactory or not suitable for school use. There shall be no sale until notice has been given by posting in at least three public places in the district for not less than two weeks, or by publication for at least once a week for a period of not less than two weeks in a newspaper published in the district and having a general circulation there. If there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district; or if there is no newspaper, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in a county in which the district or any part thereof is situated. The board shall sell the property to the highest responsible bidder, or shall reject all bids.

(b) The governing board may choose to conduct any sale of personal property authorized under this section by means of a public auction conducted by employees of the district or other public agencies, or by contract with a private auction firm. The board may delegate to the district employee responsible for conducting the auction the authority to transfer the personal property to the highest responsible bidder upon completion of the auction and after payment has been received by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17546.

(a) If the governing board, by a unanimous vote of those members present, finds that the property, whether one or more items, does not exceed in value the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it may be sold at private sale without advertising, by any employee of the district empowered for that purpose by the board.

(b) Any item or items of property having previously been offered for sale pursuant to Section 17545, but for which no qualified bid was received, may be sold at private sale without advertising by any employee of the district empowered for that purpose by the board.

(c) If the board, by a unanimous vote of those members present, finds that the property is of insufficient value to defray the costs of arranging a sale, the property may be donated to a charitable organization deemed appropriate by the board, or it may be disposed of in the local public dump on order of any employee of the district empowered for that purpose by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17547.

The money received from the sale shall be placed to the credit of the fund from which the original expenditure for the purchase of the property was made or in the general or reserve fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17548.

The governing board of any school district may dispose of personal property belonging to the district for the purpose of replacement by providing in the notice calling for bids for furnishing new materials, articles, or supplies that each bidder shall agree in his or her bid to purchase the property being replaced and to remove it from the school grounds and shall state in his or her bid the amount which he or she will deduct from the price bid for furnishing new materials, articles, or supplies as the purchase price for the personal property being purchased from the district. The board shall let the contract to any responsible bidder whose net bid is the lowest, or shall reject all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17549.

The governing board of any school district may enter into contracts with manufacturers or suppliers for the exchange of household appliances and equipment belonging to the district and used for instructional purposes for new property of like class and kind for a similar use without advertising for or taking bids. The cost to the district for the exchange shall not exceed the excess, if any, of the manufacturer’s or supplier’s selling price of the new property over the original cost to the district of the property being disposed of by the district, plus any applicable tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17550.

The governing board of any school district may, when calling for bids and letting contracts for constructing new school buildings, or repairing, altering, adding to, or reconstructing existing school buildings, or demolishing existing school buildings, require each bidder for the performance of the work to agree in his or her bid to purchase and to remove from the school grounds all old materials required by the specifications to be removed from any existing school building on the same school grounds and not required for school purposes and to state in his or her bid the amount which he or she will deduct from the price bid for the work as the purchase price of the old materials. The board shall let the contract to any responsible bidder whose net bid is the lowest, or shall reject all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17551.
